Arkansas, session 2025, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Inflation Reduction
Act of 2025."

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-201(d)(2), concerning the method of
annually adjusting the tables that determine the amount of individual income
tax due, is amended to read as follows:
(2) For purposes of subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the
cost-of-living adjustment for a calendar year is the percentage, if any, by
*JLL075*
02-19-2025 11:01:44 JLL075

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 HB1065
which the CPI for the current calendar year exceeds the CPI for the preceding
calendar year, not to exceed three percent (3%). The CPI for any calendar
year is the average of the Consumer Price Index as of the close of the
twelve-month period ending on August 31 of such calendar year. “Consumer
Price Index” means the last Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers the
West South Central division of the South Region published by the United
States Department of Labor.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-430(c), concerning the indexing of
the standard income tax deduction to inflation, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall increase annually the standard deduction provided under subsection (b)
of this section by the cost-of-living adjustment for the current calendar
year, rounding the amount to the nearest ten dollars ($10.00).
(2)(A)(i) For purposes of subdivision (c)(1) of this section,
the cost-of-living adjustment for a calendar year is the percentage, if any,
by which the Consumer Price Index for the current calendar year exceeds the
Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year, not to exceed three
percent (3%).
(ii) If the Consumer Price Index for the current
calendar year does not exceed the Consumer Price Index for the preceding
calendar year, the standard deduction shall not be adjusted under this
subsection for that year.
(B) The Consumer Price Index for a calendar year is the
average of the Consumer Price Index as of the close of the twelve-month
period ending on August 31 of that calendar year.
(C) As used in this subsection, “Consumer Price Index”
means the most recent Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers the West
South Central division of the South Region published by the United States
Department of Labor.

SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Ray
02-19-2025 11:01:44 JLL075

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 HB1065

































02-19-2025 11:01:44 JLL075